Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 4 Poll Officers

Cross references.

Penalties for offenses committed against poll officers, §§

21-2-566

,

21-2-569

,

21-2-584

,

21-2-593

.

Penalty for offenses committed by poll officers, §§

21-2-584

and

21-2-587

et seq.

21-2-90.
Appointment of chief manager and assistant managers.

All elections and primaries shall be conducted in each polling place by a board consisting of a chief manager, who shall be chairperson of such board, and two assistant managers assisted by clerks. The managers of each polling place shall be appointed by the superintendent. If the political parties involved elect to do so, they may submit to the superintendent, for consideration in making such appointment, a list of qualified persons. When such lists are submitted to the appropriate office, the superintendent, insofar as practicable, shall make appointments so that there shall be equal representation on such boards for the political parties involved in such elections or primaries. The superintendent shall make each appointment by entering an order which shall remain of record in the appropriate office and shall make such order available for public inspection upon request. The order shall include the name and address of the appointee, his or her title, and a designation of the precinct and primary or election in which he or she is to serve.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 4; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 9; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1512, § 5; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 9/HB 244; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 2/HB 540; Ga. L. 2011, p. 683, § 2/SB 82; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 4/SB 92.

21-2-91.
Appointment of clerks.

Prior to the opening of the polls in each precinct at each primary and election, the superintendent shall appoint a sufficient number of clerks to serve therein at such primary or election. If additional clerks are required during the day for the purpose of counting ballots, or for other purposes, the superintendent may appoint same.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, § 5; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-92.
Qualifications of poll officers; service during municipal election or primary; Student Teen Election Participant (STEP) program.

Poll officers appointed pursuant to Code Sections 21-2-90 and 21-2-91 shall be judicious, intelligent, and upright citizens of the United States, residents of or otherwise employed by the county in which they are appointed except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection or, in the case of municipal elections, residents of or otherwise employed by the municipality in which the election is to be held or of the county in which that municipality is located, 16 years of age or over, and shall be able to read, write, and speak the English language. No poll officer shall be eligible for any nomination for public office or to be voted for at a primary or election at which the poll officer shall serve. No person who is otherwise holding public office, other than a political party office, shall be eligible to be appointed as or to serve as a poll officer. A parent, spouse, child, brother, sister, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, brother-in-law, or sister-in-law of a candidate shall not be eligible to serve as a poll officer in any precinct in which such candidate’s name appears on the ballot in any primary or election.

A poll officer may be allowed to serve in a county that adjoins the county in which such poll officer resides if, in the discretion of the election superintendent of the county in which such person resides, the waiver of such county residency or county employment requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection do not impair the ability of the county to provide adequate staff for the performance of election duties under this chapter and if, in the discretion of the county election superintendent in which such person wishes to serve, sufficient need for more poll officers exists.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, in the event that a municipal primary or election is held in conjunction with a regular county, state, or federal election, poll officers assigned by the county election superintendent to conduct such county, state, or federal election shall also be authorized to serve as poll officers to conduct such municipal election or primary and shall not be required to be residents of said municipality.

Each local board of education and election superintendent shall be authorized to develop and implement through a coordinated effort a Student Teen Election Participant (STEP) program. The STEP program shall permit full-time public, private, and home schooled high school students to volunteer to work as poll officers during any primary, special, or general election. In addition to the qualifications set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section, a student participating in the STEP program shall:

Be a United States citizen;

Have a Georgia driver’s license or Georgia state-issued identification card;

Have demonstrated age-appropriate academic ability for the previous school year; and

Have a history of responsible school and community behavior.

A student participating in the STEP program shall at all times while working as a poll officer remain under the supervision of an adult poll officer or manager who is 21 years of age or older. No student shall be permitted to participate in the STEP program without the written authorization of his or her parent or legal guardian and such other documentation as may be required by the local board of education or election superintendent. A student in the STEP program shall work a minimum of four but not more than six hours during a single election day and shall receive age-appropriate training for serving as a poll officer. A student who successfully participates in the STEP program shall be counted as present and given full credit for the school day during which he or she served in the STEP program. No student shall be permitted to be absent from school or participate in the STEP program for more than two school days. The election superintendent and local board of education shall adopt mutually agreed upon rules, regulations, and policies prior to the initiation of a STEP program.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 649, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 3/HB 540; Ga. L. 2012, p. 1026, § 1/SB 101; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 11/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added the paragraph (a)(1) designation, inserted “except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection” near the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(1), and added paragraph (a)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Student attendance, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, Regional Educational Services,
Sec. 160-5-1-.10.

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-93.
Oath of office for managers and clerks.

Before entering upon their duties at any primary or election, all managers and clerks shall be duly sworn in the presence of each other. The chief manager shall first be sworn by an assistant manager, and the assistant managers and clerks shall then be sworn by the chief manager. Each of them shall immediately sign in duplicate the oath taken by him or her upon forms to be furnished by the superintendent, and the same shall be attested by the officer who administered the oath.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-504, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-94.
Form of manager’s oath.

The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each manager:

“I,
_______________ , do swear (or affirm) that I will as manager duly attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will not admit any person to vote, except such as I shall firmly believe to be registered and entitled to vote at such election (or primary), according to the laws of this state, that I will not vexatiously delay or refuse to permit any person to vote whom I shall believe to be entitled to vote as aforesaid, that I will use my best endeavors to prevent any fraud, deceit, or abuse in carrying on the same, that I will make a true and perfect return of the said election (or primary), and that I will at all times truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duties therein to the best of my judgment and ability.”

History.

Code 1933, § 34-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-95.
Form of clerk’s oath.

The following shall be the form of the oath to be taken by each clerk:

“I,
_______________ , do swear (or affirm) that I will as a clerk attend the ensuing election (or primary) during the continuance thereof, that I will use my best endeavors to prevent any fraud, deceit, or abuse in carrying on the same, and that I will at all times truly, impartially, and faithfully perform my duties therein to the best of my judgment and ability.”

History.

Code 1933, § 34-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Tabulating center personnel, trained and certified, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.03.

21-2-96.
Administration of oaths by managers.

Each of the managers shall have the power to administer oaths to any person claiming the right to vote or in any matter or thing required to be done or inquired into by them under this chapter.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-507, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-97.
Identification badges for poll officers.

Each poll officer, while in the performance of his or her duty, shall display conspicuously upon his or her person a badge showing his or her name and office; and such badge shall be supplied by the superintendent.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 506, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-510, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-98.
Compensation of poll officers.

The compensation of managers and clerks serving in elections shall be fixed and paid by the superintendent or, in the case of municipal elections, by the governing authority. Compensation for such poll officers serving in a primary shall be fixed and paid by the superintendent.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section, in all counties of this state having a population of 200,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census, the minimum compensation for the chief manager shall be $95.00 per diem; the minimum compensation for each assistant manager shall be $66.00 per diem; and the minimum compensation for each clerk shall be $60.00 per diem.

It shall not be necessary to compensate volunteers who are appointed to serve as poll officers and who agree to perform the duties of manager or clerk without compensation.

History.

Ga. L. 1896, p. 40, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, § 82; Code 1933, § 34-1303; Ga. L. 1952, p. 197, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 218, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-508, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 513, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2590, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 570, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 4/HB 540.

21-2-99.
Instruction of poll officers and workers in election procedures; certifications; notification of completion of training to Secretary of State.

The election superintendent shall provide adequate training to all poll officers and poll workers regarding the use of voting equipment, voting procedures, all aspects of state and federal law applicable to conducting elections, and the poll officers’ or poll workers’ duties in connection therewith prior to each general primary and general election and each special primary and special election; provided, however, such training shall not be required for a special election held between the date of the general primary and the general election. Upon successful completion of such instruction, the superintendent shall give to each poll officer and poll worker a certificate to the effect that such person has been found qualified to conduct such primary or election with the particular type of voting equipment in use in that jurisdiction. Additionally, the superintendent shall notify the Secretary of State on forms to be provided by the Secretary of State of the date when such instruction was held and the number of persons attending and completing such instruction. For the purpose of giving such instructions, the superintendent shall call such meeting or meetings of poll officers and poll workers as shall be necessary. Each poll officer shall, upon notice, attend such meeting or meetings called for his or her instruction.

No poll officer or poll worker shall serve at any primary or election unless he or she shall have received instructions, as described in subsection (a) of this Code section; shall have been found qualified to perform his or her duties in connection with the type of voting equipment to be used in that jurisdiction; and shall have received a certificate to that effect from the superintendent; provided, however, that this shall not prevent the appointment of a poll officer or poll worker to fill a vacancy arising on the day of a primary or election or on the preceding day.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-509, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 10/HB 244.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Training and certification of tabulating center personnel, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Voting Machines — Vote Recorders, § 183-1-12-.03.

Law reviews.

For article, “YLD Poll Worker Program Addresses Critical Need,” see 26 Ga. St. B.J. 10 (Feb. 2021).

21-2-100.
Training of local election officials.

The election superintendent and at least one registrar of the county or, in counties with boards of election or combined boards of election and registration, at least one member of the board or a designee of the board shall attend a minimum of 12 hours’ training annually as may be selected by the Secretary of State. The election superintendent and at least one registrar of each municipality shall attend a minimum of 12 hours’ training biennially as may be selected by the Secretary of State.

The basis for the minimum requirement of training shall be two calendar years.

A waiver of the requirement of minimum training, either in whole or in part, may be granted by the Secretary of State, in the discretion of the Secretary of State, upon the presentation of evidence by the election superintendent, registrar, or board that the individual was unable to complete such training due to medical disability, providential cause, or other reason deemed sufficient by the Secretary of State.

The cost of the training shall be borne by the governing authority of each county from county funds and by the municipal governing authority from municipal funds.

A superintendent or registrar and the county or municipal governing authority which employs the superintendent or registrar may be fined by the State Election Board for failure to attend the training required in this Code section.

The minimum training required under this Code section shall not apply to deputy registrars.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-100

, enacted by Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1231, §§ 4, 28; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 5; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 11/HB 244.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1994, p. 1443, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval [April 15, 1994] for the purpose of authorizing the Secretary of State to design and distribute such forms and materials and to develop, procure, and install such computer hardware and software as are required under the provisions of this Act and to exercise such administrative authority as such officer deems necessary and proper for the implementation of this Act. For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective January 1, 1995.”

21-2-101.
Certification program for county and municipal election superintendents or election board designee; waiver of certification; failure to comply; remedial training; regulatory authority.

All county and municipal election superintendents, chief registrars, and absentee ballot clerks or, in the case of a board of elections or a board of elections and registration, the designee of such board charged with the daily operations of such board shall become certified by completing a certification program approved by the Secretary of State within six months following their appointment. Such program may include instruction on, and may require the superintendent to demonstrate proficiency in, the operation of the state’s direct recording electronic voting equipment, the operation of the voting equipment used in such superintendent’s jurisdiction, and in state and federal law and procedures related to elections. The local government employing the superintendent or designee shall cover the costs, if any, incurred by such superintendent’s or designee’s participation in the certification program. Such certification programs shall be offered by the Secretary of State on multiple occasions before December 31 of the year in which such superintendents or designees are appointed and shall not exceed 64 hours of classroom, online, and practical instruction as authorized and approved by the Secretary of State.

Reserved.

A full, partial, or conditional waiver of the certification requirement may be granted by the Secretary of State, in the discretion of the Secretary of State, upon the presentation of evidence by the election superintendent or board that the individual was unable to complete such training due to medical disability, providential cause, or other reason deemed sufficient by the Secretary of State.

In the event that a municipality authorizes a county to conduct its elections pursuant to Code Section 21-2-45, the municipality may be granted by the Secretary of State, in the discretion of the Secretary of State, a waiver of the certification requirement, provided that the superintendent in charge of running the municipal election shall have previously completed a certification program approved by the Secretary of State and has demonstrated a proficiency in the operation of the voting equipment used in said municipality.

A superintendent and the county or municipal governing authority which employs such superintendent may be fined by the State Election Board for failure to attain the certification required in this Code section.

After notice and hearing as provided in Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” the State Election Board may require additional or remedial training or limit, suspend, or revoke the certification of a superintendent if such superintendent is found to have violated any provision of this chapter or any rule, regulation, or order issued by the State Election Board. In its discretion, the State Election Board may reinstate such certification.

The State Election Board is authorized to promulgate, amend, or repeal rules and regulations for the implementation of this Code section. Such rules and regulations may include provisions related to additional or remedial training or the limitation, suspension, revocation, or reinstatement of a superintendent’s certification issued by the Secretary of State.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-101

, enacted by Ga. L. 2003, p. 517, § 9; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 12/HB 244; Ga. L. 2007, p. 544, § 1/SB 194; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 5/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 5/HB 540; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 1/HB 268; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 21/SB 365.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, substituted “within six months following their appointment” for “by no later than December 31 of the year in which they are appointed” at the end of the first sentence of subsection (a); substituted the present provisions of subsection (b) for the former provisions, which read: “Any county chief registrar or municipal absentee ballot clerk appointed prior to January 1, 2010, who has not met the certification requirement shall complete a certification program approved by the Secretary of State by no later than December 31, 2011”; and added subsections (e) and (f).

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised punctuation in the first sentence of subsection (e).